Idaho, session 2026, S1373.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Economic Development the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,004,100 $846,700 $1,850,800
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 914,400 133,600 1,048,000
Facilities Maintenance
Fund 203,000 173,100 376,100
TOTAL $2,121,500 $1,153,400 $3,274,900
B. ANIMAL INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,508,900 $267,100 $2,776,000
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 38,500 9,700 48,200
Agricultural Fees - Livestock Disease Control
Fund 1,069,000 533,000 $20,600 1,622,600
Agricultural Fees - Dairy Inspection
Fund 2,356,800 492,000 20,300 2,869,100
Agricultural Fees - Egg Inspection
Fund 134,800 64,100 198,900
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Fisheries
Fund 5,700 4,200 9,900
Agricultural Fees - Poultry Inspection
Fund 36,000 17,500 53,500
Depredation of Livestock and Prevention
Fund 75,000 $150,000 225,000
Seminars and Publications
Fund 58,300 58,300
Federal Grant
Fund 436,300 117,300 0 48,200 601,800
TOTAL $6,586,000 $1,638,200 $40,900 $198,200 $8,463,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Agricultural Fees - Pesticides
Fund $2,775,700 $923,900 $23,500 $3,723,100
Federal Grant
Fund 486,500 43,400 0 529,900
TOTAL $3,262,200 $967,300 $23,500 $4,253,000
D. PLANT INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,467,600 $2,025,700 $15,900 $2,341,500 $7,850,700
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 1,629,200 309,200 111,100 2,049,500
Invasive Species
Fund 1,385,300 865,000 100,000 2,350,300
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Feed and Fertilizer
Fund 1,699,600 535,800 2,235,400
Agricultural Fees - Honey Advertising
Fund 400 22,000 22,400
Agricultural Fees - Hemp
Fund 110,200 55,000 165,200
Quality Assurance Laboratory Services
Fund 452,500 137,700 590,200
Federal Grant
Fund 1,351,200 1,098,300 0 946,700 3,396,200
TOTAL $10,096,000 $5,048,700 $15,900 $3,499,300 $18,659,900
E. AGRICULTURAL INSPECTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $999,800 $233,800 $1,233,600
Weights and Measures Inspection
Fund 577,400 205,700 $8,000 791,100
Agricultural Fees - Organic Food Products
Fund 697,600 110,000 1,700 809,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
AgriculturalFees- FreshFruitandVegetableInspection
Fund 8,878,600 2,763,300 65,000 11,706,900
TOTAL $11,153,400 $3,312,800 $74,700 $14,540,900
F. MARKET DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $567,100 $488,100 $1,055,200
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 88,200 74,100 162,300
Seminars and Publications
Fund 245,600 245,600
RuralEconomicDevelopmentIntegratedFreightTransportation
Fund 10,500 20,000 $140,000 170,500
Revolving Loans
Fund 12,300 15,300 27,600
Federal Grant
Fund 286,100 628,100 2,167,500 3,081,700
TOTAL $964,200 $1,471,200 $2,307,500 $4,742,900
G. ANIMAL DAMAGE CONTROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,000 $153,600 $157,600
Animal Damage Control
Fund 100,000 100,000
Agricultural Fees - Sheep and Goat Health
Fund 7,200 160,200 167,400
TOTAL $11,200 $413,800 $425,000
H. SHEEP AND GOAT HEALTH BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $90,700 $90,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Agricultural Fees - Sheep and Goat Health
Fund 72,500 $38,300 110,800
TOTAL $163,200 $38,300 $201,500
DIVISION
TOTAL $34,346,500 $13,641,100 $155,000 $6,418,800 $54,561,400
II. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,517,000 $212,800 $1,805,200 $3,535,000
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 30,000 30,000
Resource Conservation and Rangeland Development
Fund 221,000 166,500 $200 387,700
Clean Water Revolving Loan (SCC)
Fund 0 30,000 0 0 30,000
TOTAL $1,738,000 $439,300 $200 $1,805,200 $3,982,700
III. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE:
A. COMMERCE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,450,700 $1,502,400 $1,250,000 $5,203,100
Idaho Opportunity
Fund 3,000,000 3,000,000
Tourism and Promotion
Fund 1,388,500 14,208,200 12,288,600 27,885,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 157,500 157,500
Seminars and Publications
Fund 378,400 378,400
Federal Grant
Fund 478,700 248,300 15,595,800 16,322,800
TOTAL $4,317,900 $16,494,800 $32,134,400 $52,947,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. BROADBAND OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $372,900 $21,900 $394,800
ARPA Capital Projects
Fund 313,700 313,700
Federal Grant
Fund 313,700 1,675,000 $148,025,000 150,013,700
TOTAL $1,000,300 $1,696,900 $148,025,000 $150,722,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $5,318,200 $18,191,700 $180,159,400 $203,669,300
IV. DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $9,567,500 $2,212,800 $11,780,300
Mortgage Recovery
Fund 50,000 50,000
Securities Investor Training
Fund 0 50,000 50,000
TOTAL $9,567,500 $2,312,800 $11,880,300
V. INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION:
A. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $6,889,400 $2,299,400 $1,355,600 $10,544,400
PeaceOfficerandDetentionOfficerTemporaryDisability
Fund 8,900 3,800 156,100 168,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 55,000 0 55,000
TOTAL $6,898,300 $2,358,200 $1,511,700 $10,768,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. REHABILITATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $4,524,700 $1,178,000 $5,702,700
C. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $279,400 $279,400
Crime Victims Compensation
Fund $1,110,100 $325,100 2,000,000 3,435,200
Federal Grant
Fund 0 0 1,639,000 1,639,000
TOTAL $1,110,100 $325,100 $3,918,400 $5,353,600
DIVISION
TOTAL $12,533,100 $3,861,300 $5,430,100 $21,824,500
VI. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE:
A. INSURANCE REGULATION:
FROM:
Insurance Administrative
Fund $6,515,000 $3,205,500 $9,720,500
Federal Grant
Fund 362,200 356,100 $42,000 760,300
TOTAL $6,877,200 $3,561,600 $42,000 $10,480,800
B. STATE FIRE MARSHAL:
FROM:
Arson, Fire and Fraud Prevention
Fund $1,341,900 $375,400 $28,000 $1,745,300
DIVISION
TOTAL $8,219,100 $3,937,000 $70,000 $12,226,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VII. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR:
A. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $59,900 $38,400 $98,300
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 1,033,100 881,800 1,914,900
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 1,367,100 1,836,000 3,203,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 498,800 130,200 629,000
Federal Grant
Fund 10,782,900 8,938,200 $75,100 19,796,200
TOTAL $13,741,800 $11,824,600 $75,100 $25,641,500
B. DETERMINATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $517,700 $700 $518,400
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 2,818,200 1,184,400 4,002,600
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 3,387,600 850,100 4,237,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 621,000 3,785,900 $15,000 4,421,900
Federal Grant
Fund 26,284,500 5,357,300 $794,200 2,409,500 34,845,500
TOTAL $33,629,000 $11,178,400 $794,200 $2,424,500 $48,026,100
C. WORKFORCE AND COMMISSIONS:
FROM:
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund $382,400 $502,000 $176,100 $1,060,500
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 3,350,600 279,200 3,629,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 280,500 204,700 485,200
Federal Grant
Fund 12,758,300 2,768,800 0 $11,550,000 27,077,100
TOTAL $16,771,800 $3,754,700 $176,100 $11,550,000 $32,252,600
DIVISION
TOTAL $64,142,600 $26,757,700 $1,045,400 $13,974,500 $105,920,200
VIII. PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $219,300 $219,300
Public Utilities Commission
Fund $5,351,400 1,725,600 7,077,000
Federal Grant
Fund 316,600 69,200 385,800
TOTAL $5,668,000 $2,014,100 $7,682,100
IX. COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS:
FROM:
General
Fund $198,900 $79,000 $277,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 80,000 177,500 257,500
TOTAL $278,900 $256,500 $535,400
X. IDAHO STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,121,200 $1,536,600 $45,800 $31,600 $4,735,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,461,500 1,589,500 3,051,000
Records Management Service
Fund 224,800 36,800 147,400 409,000
Capitol Commission Operating
Fund 97,400 53,500 150,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 1,267,300 982,800 0 130,000 2,380,100
TOTAL $6,172,200 $4,199,200 $193,200 $161,600 $10,726,200
XI. IDAHO COMMISSION FOR LIBRARIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,477,000 $1,671,500 $610,000 $4,758,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 55,000 $5,000 10,000 70,000
Federal Grant
Fund 928,100 908,600 25,000 90,000 1,951,700
TOTAL $3,405,100 $2,635,100 $30,000 $710,000 $6,780,200
XII. STATE LOTTERY:
FROM:
State Lottery
Fund $5,042,600 $3,564,800 $53,400 $8,660,800
XIII. STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
A. OFFICE OF THE STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,713,300 $308,500 $4,021,800
B. CAPITAL AND CONFLICT REPRESENTATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $172,100 $172,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $3,713,300 $480,600 $4,193,900
XIV. DIVISION OF VETERANS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,494,400 $209,400 $32,400 $1,736,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Veterans Recognition Income
Fund 1,000,000 195,000 1,195,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 21,663,200 8,141,800 29,805,000
Veterans Home Endowment Income
Fund 251,700 663,000 1,500 916,200
Federal Grant
Fund 18,621,200 13,131,300 0 31,752,500
TOTAL $42,030,500 $23,145,500 $228,900 $65,404,900
XV. OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,413,000 $31,582,700 $42,995,700
Public Defense
Fund 36,204,100 2,500,000 38,704,100
TOTAL $47,617,100 $34,082,700 $81,699,800
XVI.DIVISIONOFOCCUPATIONALANDPROFESSIONALLICENSES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $50,000 $50,000
B. BUILDING CONSTRUCTION & REAL ESTATE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $15,908,200 $4,896,000 $26,000 $20,830,200
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Industrial Safety
Fund 875,300 100,600 975,900
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Logging
Fund 508,900 126,000 634,900
Federal Grant
Fund 165,200 50,900 0 216,100
TOTAL $17,457,600 $5,173,500 $26,000 $22,657,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $3,835,600 $1,336,900 $28,600 $5,201,100
D. HEALTH PROFESSIONS:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $5,044,200 $3,846,200 $500 $8,890,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $26,337,400 $10,406,600 $55,100 $36,799,100
XVII. OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,278,000 $288,300 $1,566,300
XVIII. OFFICE OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES OMBUDSMAN:
FROM:
General
Fund $339,200 $111,600 $450,800
XIX. COMMISSION OF PARDONS & PAROLE:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,492,400 $694,200 $4,186,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 70,700 70,700
TOTAL $3,492,400 $764,900 $4,257,300
XX. IDAHO TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT:
A. TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
1. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $16,820,600 $18,878,400 $35,699,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 0 611,100 $300,000 911,100
TOTAL $16,820,600 $19,489,500 $300,000 $36,610,100
2. CAPITAL FACILITIES:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $100,000 $100,000
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $300,000 6,765,000 7,065,000
TOTAL $300,000 $6,865,000 $7,165,000
3. AERONAUTICS:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $1,584,300 $874,700 $1,250,000 $3,709,000
State Aeronautics (Federal)
Fund 87,000 573,200 0 660,200
TOTAL $1,671,300 $1,447,900 $1,250,000 $4,369,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $18,491,900 $21,237,400 $6,865,000 $1,550,000 $48,144,300
B. MOTOR VEHICLES:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $20,770,100 $14,700,700 $361,700 $35,832,500
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 0 3,600,000 0 3,600,000
TOTAL $20,770,100 $18,300,700 $361,700 $39,432,500
C. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $120,898,600 $69,603,100 $522,000 $191,023,700
State Highway (Local)
Fund 312,000 73,900 385,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 13,335,700 8,908,400 27,943,600 50,187,700
TOTAL $134,546,300 $78,585,400 $28,465,600 $241,597,300
D. CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION & RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $2,463,300 $115,447,700 $536,700 $118,447,700
State Highway (Local)
Fund 100,000 11,322,900 100,000 11,522,900
Transportation Expansion and Congestion Mitigation
Fund 42,273,800 42,273,800
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 7,536,700 427,247,600 1,963,300 436,747,600
TOTAL $10,100,000 $596,292,000 $2,600,000 $608,992,000
GRANDTOTAL $455,048,000 $279,314,300 $605,065,900 $241,559,200 $1,580,987,400
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Economic Development is authorized no
more than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any
point during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, unless specifi-
cally authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Commit-
tee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Agriculture ....................................230.00
Soil and Water Conservation Commission .........................16.75
Department of Commerce ........................................41.00
Department of Finance .........................................74.00
Industrial Commission .......................................129.00
Department of Insurance .......................................77.50
Department of Labor ..........................................644.00
Public Utilities Commission ...................................49.00
Commission on Hispanic Affairs .................................3.00
Idaho State Historical Society ................................61.00
Idaho Commission for Libraries ................................33.75
Idaho State Lottery ...........................................51.00
State Appellate Public Defender ...............................27.00
Division of Veterans Services ................................429.10
Office of the State Public Defender ...........................333.96
Division of Occupational and Professional Licenses ............267.20


Office of Administrative Hearings ..............................9.00
Office of Health and Social Services Ombudsman ...................3.00
Commission of Pardons and Parole ...............................37.00
Idaho Transportation Department ............................1,645.00
SECTION 3. WATERCRAFT INSPECTION PROGRAM. The Department of Agricul-
ture shall maximize the use of the appropriation provided for the watercraft
inspection program to minimize the chances of spreading zebra mussels,
quagga mussels, and other aquatic invasive species into Idaho waters. The
department is encouraged to use roving inspection stations when appropri-
ate and to expand hours of coverage during holidays when boat transport
traffic is likely to increase. It is also encouraged to use extra staffing
on busy holiday weekends. The department shall gather data regarding the
number of watercraft that are bypassing the stations and nighttime trans-
port of watercraft across Idaho's borders. The department shall also seek
to secure federal funding to further enhance invasive species detection
and prevention efforts. The department shall report back to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee, the Senate Agricultural Affairs Committee,
and the House Agricultural Affairs Committee during the 2027 legislative
session regarding the results of the data gathering, attainment of federal
funds, and an operational review of the boat stations.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER TO THE DEPREDATION OF LIVESTOCK AND PREVENTION
FUND. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture and the
Office of the State Controller shall transfer $225,000 from the General Fund
to the Depredation of Livestock and Prevention Fund on July 1, 2026, or as
soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027, to provide for the compensation for depredation of livestock by griz-
zly bears and wolves.
SECTION 5. TRUSTEE AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS DISTRIBUTION. Of the amount ap-
propriated to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission in Section 1 of this
act for trustee and benefit payments, $300,000 shall be distributed equally
among the 50 soil and water conservation districts in addition to the amounts
authorized pursuant to Section 22-2727, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO BROADBAND FUND.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department
of Commerce from the Idaho Broadband Fund for fiscal year 2026, not to exceed
$33,066,900, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for broadband infra-
structure for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA CAPITAL PROJECTS
FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any un-
expended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
Department of Commerce from the ARPA Capital Projects Fund for fiscal year


2026, not to exceed $89,011,100, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures
for broadband infrastructure for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE FEDERAL GRANT FUND. There
is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of
Commerce from the Federal Grant Fund for fiscal year 2026, not to exceed
$150,000,000, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for broadband in-
frastructure for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 9. BROADBAND GRANTS. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
all moneys appropriated from the ARPA Capital Projects Fund and Federal
Grant Fund to the Department of Commerce for the purpose of broadband grants
shall be allocated at the direction of the Idaho Broadband Advisory Board.
SECTION 10. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. The Department of Fi-
nance is hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for reimburse-
ment of persons to whom the Idaho Judicial Branch has made a final deter-
mination of actual damages resulting from acts constituting violations of
the Idaho Residential Mortgage Practices Act by a mortgage broker, mortgage
lender, or mortgage loan originator who was licensed or required to be li-
censed pursuant to Chapter 31, Title 26, Idaho Code.
SECTION 11. USE OF PERSONNEL COSTS. The Department of Insurance shall
not use the moneys appropriated to it in Section 1 of this act to pay or reim-
burse personnel costs at other state agencies.
SECTION 12. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. Amounts necessary to
pay prizes, retailer commissions, advertising and promotional costs, and
gaming supplier vendor fees based on sales shall be continuously appropri-
ated to the Idaho State Lottery in accordance with the provisions of Section
67-7428, Idaho Code.
SECTION 13. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR CAPITAL APPEALS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the State Appellate Public Defender any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Ap-
pellate Public Defender from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026, in an
amount not to exceed $1,169,400, for costs directly related to the provision
of representation in capital cases, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the
State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense
class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing
the reappropriation authorized herein.


SECTION 14. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR NONCAPITAL APPEALS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the State Appellate Public Defender any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Ap-
pellate Public Defender from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026, in an
amount not to exceed $52,900, for costs directly related to outside counsel
for noncapital appeals, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the pe-
riod July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.
SECTION 15. EXPENSES PAID FOR THE USE OF COUNTY FACILITIES FOR INDIGENT
PUBLIC DEFENSE. Pursuant to Section 19-6008, Idaho Code, any county provid-
ing office space to a county office of public defense or a joint county office
of public defense as of January 1, 2023, shall continue to make available the
same or substantially similar office space for the use of the Office of the
State Public Defender until July 1, 2029. It is the intent of this section
to include parking as part of the continued use of facilities until July 1,
2029. The Office of the State Public Defender shall reimburse the board of
county commissioners for parking expenses at a reasonable rate and not to ex-
ceed what is charged to county employees.
SECTION 16. EXEMPTION FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Division
of Occupational and Professional Licenses is hereby exempted from the pro-
visions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers be-
tween programs for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 17. CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED MONEYS. All moneys transferred
to the Local Bridge Inspection Account and to the Railroad Grade Crossing
Protection Account, as provided in Section 63-2412, Idaho Code, are hereby
continuously appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department for the
stated purpose of those funds.
SECTION 18. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 19. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.


SECTION 20. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.